Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4290.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 13a. (1) An employer shall not do any of the following: (a) Require as a condition of employment, nondisclosure by include in a written policy a statement, or otherwise implement or engage in a practice that prohibits or discourages an employee of his or her from disclosing the employee's wages. (b) Require an employee to sign a waiver or other document which that purports to deny an employee the right to disclose his or her the employee's wages. (c) Discharge, formally discipline, or otherwise discriminate against for job advancement an employee who discloses his or her the employee's wages. (d) Ask an individual seeking employment for information regarding the individual's past wages, fringe benefits, credit score, or credit history or otherwise seek information regarding the individual's past wages, fringe benefits, credit score, or credit history. This subdivision does not apply to an employer or agent of an employer that is required by law or a self-regulatory organization as that term is defined in section 78c(a)(26) of the securities exchange act of 1934, 15 USC 78c, to use an individual's past wages, fringe benefits, credit score, or credit history for employment purposes, including, but not limited to, bonding requirements.